North Carolina, session 2025, HB146.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-7. Issuance and renewal of drivers licenses.
…
(f) Duration and Renewal of Licenses. – Drivers licenses shall be issued and renewed
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
…
(6) Remote renewal or conversion. – Subject to the following requirements and
limitations, the Division may offer remote renewal of a drivers license or
remote conversion of a full provisional license issued by the Division:
a. Requirements. – To be eligible for remote renewal or conversion under
this subdivision, a person must meet all of the following requirements:
…
4. For a remote renewal, the most recent renewal was an
in-person renewal and not a remote renewal under this
subdivision.subdivision, except that an active duty member of
the Armed Forces of the United States or a reserve component
of the Armed Forces of the United States, who is stationed
outside of this State, and the member's spouse and dependent
children may remotely renew a license a second consecutive
time if either of the following applies:
I. The license being renewed is not REAL ID compliant
pursuant to the REAL ID Act of 2005, 49 U.S.C. §
30301.
II. The license being renewed is REAL ID compliant but
is being converted to a non-REAL ID compliant license
for purposes of the renewal.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to licenses
renewed on or after that date.
*H146-v-3*